Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska45-926
Operating without a license; penalty.

Any person required to be licensed under the Delayed Deposit Services Licensing Act who operates a delayed deposit services business in this state without first obtaining a license under the act or while such license is suspended or revoked by the director shall be guilty of a Class IV felony.

Laws 1994, LB 967, § 26.